Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2728
Bonds; officers' signatures; validity.

If any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under section 18-2724 cease to be such officers before the delivery of such obligations, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes to the same extent as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 5.